Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 3. Initial Issuance of Entry Permits.

Sec. 16.43.200.
Administrative areas.

The commission shall establish administrative areas suitable for regulating and controlling entry into the commercial fisheries. The commission shall make the administrative areas reasonably compatible with the geographic areas for which specific commercial fishing regulations are adopted by the Board of Fisheries.

The commission may modify or change the boundaries of administrative areas when necessary and consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 30 ch 206 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For fishery identification system, administrative areas and annual fees, see 20 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 16.43.210.
Interim-use permit; qualifications.

For each fishery that is not subject to a maximum number of entry permits under AS

16.43.240

and not subject to a moratorium under AS

16.43.225

, the commission shall issue interim-use permits under regulations adopted by the commission to all applicants who can establish their present ability to participate actively in the fishery for which they are making application.

Before the issuance of the maximum number of entry permits for a given fishery, the commission may issue an interim-use permit to an applicant who may later become eligible for an entry permit under AS

16.43.270

.

To the extent that the commissioner of fish and game authorizes it under AS

16.05.050(a)(9)

, the commission may grant an interim-use permit to a person to engage in the commercial taking from a fishery on an experimental basis.

The sustained yield management and economic health of the following fisheries is severely impaired as a result, among other factors, of too many units of gear participating in the commercial harvest:

Bristol Bay registration area — drift gillnet fishery;

Cook Inlet registration area — drift gillnet fishery;

Prince William Sound registration area — drift gillnet fishery.

[Repealed, § 69 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 69 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 35 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 6 ch 34 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 87 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in subsection (c), “AS

16.05.050

(a)(9)” was substituted for “AS

16.05.050

(10)” to reflect the 1999 addition of AS

16.05.050(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 4.

For priority classification point system, see 20 AAC 5, art. 6.

Sec. 16.43.220.
Terms and conditions of interim-use permits.

The commission shall adopt regulations specifying the dates and places of application, the procedures to be followed in renewal of the interim-use permit including the time, place of its renewal, and for any other purpose incident to the administration of interim-use permits for that fishery. An interim-use permit shall expire upon the final determination of the holder’s eligibility for an entry permit.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 73 SLA 1977.]

The holder of an interim-use permit shall have the permit in possession at all times when engaged in the operation of the gear for which it was issued.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 2 ch 126 SLA 1974; am § 9 ch 73 SLA 1977)

Administrative Code. —

For interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 4.

Sec. 16.43.225.
Moratorium on new entrants into certain fisheries.

Subject to (b) of this section, the commission may establish a moratorium on new entrants into a fishery

that has experienced recent increases in fishing effort that are beyond a low, sporadic level of effort;

that has achieved a level of harvest that may be approaching or exceeding the maximum sustainable level for the fishery; and

for which there is insufficient biological and resource management information necessary to promote the conservation and sustained yield management of the fishery.

The commission may establish a moratorium on new entrants into a fishery described in (a) of this section if

the commissioner of fish and game, subject to AS

16.05.251(g)

, petitions the commission under AS

44.62.220

to establish a moratorium on new entrants into the fishery; and

the commission finds that

the fishery has reached a level of participation that may threaten the conservation and the sustained yield management of the fishery resource and the economic health and stability of commercial fishing; and

the commission has insufficient information to conclude that the establishment of a maximum number of entry permits under AS

16.43.240

would further the purposes of this chapter.

The commission may establish a moratorium under this section for a continuous period of up to four years. A fishery that has been subject to a moratorium under this section may not be subjected to a subsequent moratorium under this section unless five years have elapsed since the previous moratorium expired.

While a moratorium is in effect, the commission shall conduct investigations to determine whether a maximum number of entry permits should be established under AS

16.43.240

by

conducting research into conditions in the fishery;

consulting with the Department of Fish and Game and the Board of Fisheries; and

consulting with participants in the fishery.

The commission shall establish by regulation the qualifications for applicants for an interim-use permit for a fishery subject to a moratorium under this section. The qualifications must include the minimum requirements for past or present participation and harvest in the fishery. The commission may not issue an interim-use permit for a fishery subject to a moratorium under this section unless the applicant can satisfy the qualifications established under this subsection and establish the present ability and intent to participate actively in the fishery.

History.

(§ 7 ch 34 SLA 1991)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 34, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For fisheries subject to moratoria on new entrants, see 20 AAC 5, art. 10.

For transfer of entry and interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 17.

Sec. 16.43.227.
Southeast Alaska Dungeness crab fishery.

The commission may establish a moratorium on new entrants into the southeast Alaska Dungeness crab fishery for a continuous period of up to four years without complying with AS

16.43.225(a)

— (c). While the moratorium is in effect, the commission shall

conduct the investigation required under AS

16.43.225(d)

;

establish by regulation the qualifications for an interim-use permit for the fishery, including minimum requirements for past or present participation and harvest in the fishery; and

issue interim-use permits for the fishery to applicants who satisfy the qualifications established under (2) of this subsection and who establish the present ability and intent to participate actively in the fishery.

Notwithstanding AS

16.43.225

, for the purposes of this chapter

an interim-use permit issued under this section shall be treated as an interim-use permit issued under AS

16.43.225

;

a moratorium established under this section shall be treated as a moratorium established under AS 16.43.225.

History.

(§ 7 ch 34 SLA 1991)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 34, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For priority classification point system, see 20 AAC 5, art. 6.

For fisheries subject to moratoria on new entrants, see 20 AAC 5, art. 10.

For transfer of entry and interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 17.

Sec. 16.43.228.
Southeast Alaska dive fisheries.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 125 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 4 ch 125 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 4 ch 125 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 4 ch 125 SLA 1996.]

[Repealed, § 22 ch 9 SLA 2014.]

Notwithstanding AS

16.43.225

, for the purposes of this chapter,

an interim-use permit issued under this section shall be treated as an interim-use permit issued under AS

16.43.225

;

a moratorium established under this section shall be treated as a moratorium established under AS 16.43.225.

The commission may not consider participation in a fishery, subject to a moratorium on entry under this section, that occurs during the period of the moratorium in determining eligibility for an entry permit that may be issued for the fishery after termination of the moratorium.

History.

(§ 2 ch 125 SLA 1996; am § 22 ch 9 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 125, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 16.43.230.
Designation of distressed fisheries.

Pending the determination of maximum numbers of entry permits under AS

16.43.240

and before the initial issue of entry permits under AS

16.43.270

, the commission shall designate as distressed fisheries those for which it estimates that the optimum number of entry permits will be less than the highest number of units of gear fished in that fishery during any one of the four years immediately preceding January 1, 1973.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For limited fisheries, see 20 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 16.43.240.
Determination of the maximum number of entry permits for initial issue.

Except as provided in AS

16.43.270(a)

, the maximum number of entry permits for a distressed fishery designated under AS

16.43.230

shall be the highest number of units of gear fished in that fishery during any one of the four years immediately preceding January 1, 1973.

When the commission finds that a fishery, not designated as a distressed fishery under AS

16.43.230

or not subject to a moratorium under AS

16.43.225

, has reached levels of participation that require the limitation of entry under AS

16.43.140

—

16.43.330

in order to achieve the purposes of this chapter, the commission shall establish the maximum number of entry permits for that fishery.

When the commission finds that a fishery subject to a moratorium under AS

16.43.225

has reached levels of participation that require the limitation of entry under AS

16.43.140

—

16.43.330

in order to achieve the purposes of this chapter, the commission shall establish the maximum number of entry permits for that fishery.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am §§ 8, 9 ch 34 SLA 1991; am §§ 7, 8 ch 137 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For limited fisheries, see 20 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 16.43.250.
Standards for initial issue of entry permits.

Following the establishment of the maximum number of units of gear for a particular fishery under AS

16.43.240

, the commission shall adopt regulations establishing qualifications for ranking applicants for entry permits according to the degree of hardship that they would suffer by exclusion from the fishery. The regulations shall define priority classifications of similarly situated applicants based upon a reasonable balance of the following hardship standards:

degree of economic dependence upon the fishery, including, when reasonable for the fishery, the percentage of income derived from the fishery, reliance on alternative occupations, availability of alternative occupations, investment in vessels and gear;

extent of past participation in the fishery, including, when reasonable for the fishery, the number of years of participation in the fishery, and the consistency of participation during each year.

The commission shall designate in the regulations those priority classifications of applicants who would suffer significant economic hardship by exclusion from the fishery.

The commission shall designate in the regulations those priority classifications of applicants who would suffer only minor economic hardship by exclusion from the fishery.

If an individual eligible to apply under AS

16.43.260(a)

has applied during application periods established under AS

16.43.260(b)

for two or more entry permits under AS

16.43.260(d)

or (e) for the same specific fishery resource and the same specific type of gear in different administrative areas, but has failed to qualify for an entry permit for that type of fishery resource and gear, the individual’s cumulative qualifications may be credited to the fishery for which the individual is most qualified. The commission shall issue an entry permit to the individual for the fishery if the individual’s cumulative qualifications result in placing the individual in a category designated in (b) of this section. The qualifications credited to a fishery under this subsection may not be considered for the purpose of ranking the applicant under (a)-(c) of this section for any other fishery. The commission may not revoke any permit previously issued notwithstanding the issuance of permits in excess of the maximum number established under AS

16.43.230

—

16.43.240

as a result of this subsection. In this subsection, “fishery” includes all salmon fisheries of the state for which a maximum number of entry permits has been established by the commission under AS

16.43.240

(b).

If the cumulative qualifications of an individual under (d) of this section include points granted by the commission under (a) of this section for more than one fishery and the number of points required to place an applicant in the priority classification under (b) of this section is not the same for each of the fisheries, the commission shall obtain a quotient for the individual by dividing the number of points the individual has been granted for each fishery by the number of points needed to place an applicant in a priority classification under (b) of this section for that fishery. If the sum of the quotients obtained under this subsection equals or exceeds 1.00, the individual is entitled to a permit under (d) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1979; am § 1 ch 137 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 47 SLA 1981; am § 5 ch 22 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

The last sentence of (d) and subsection (e) were enacted as (e) and (f), respectively. Reorganized in 1980.

Administrative Code. —

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.

For priority classification point system, see 20 AAC 5, art. 6.

Legislative history reports. —

For legislative letter of intent relating to the 1985 amendments to (a) of this section, see 1985 Senate Journal, p. 483.

Sec. 16.43.260.
Application for initial issue of entry permits.

The commission shall accept applications for entry permits only from applicants who have harvested fishery resources commercially while participating in the fishery as holders of gear licenses issued under former AS

16.05.536

—

16.05.670

or interim-use permits under AS

16.43.210(a)

or

16.43.225

before the qualification date established in (d), (e), or (f) of this section. The commission may specify by regulation the calendar years of participation that will be considered for eligibility purposes.

The commission shall establish the opening and closing dates, places and form of application for entry permits for each fishery. The commission may require the submission of specific verified evidence establishing the applicant’s qualifications under the regulations adopted under AS

16.43.250

.

When an applicant is unable to establish qualifications for an entry permit by submitting the specific verified evidence required in the application by the commission, the applicant may request and obtain an administrative adjudication of the application according to the procedures established in AS

16.43.110(b)

. At the hearing the applicant may present alternative evidence of qualifications for an entry permit.

Except as provided in (e) or (f) of this section, an applicant shall be assigned to a priority classification based solely upon the applicant’s qualifications as of January 1, 1973.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, when the commission establishes the maximum number of entry permits for a particular fishery under AS

16.43.240

after January 1, 1975, an applicant shall be assigned to a priority classification based solely upon the applicant’s qualifications as of January 1 of the year during which the commission establishes the maximum number of entry permits for the fishery for which application is made.

When the commission establishes the maximum number of entry permits under AS

16.43.240

for a fishery that is subject to a moratorium under AS

16.43.225

, an applicant for an entry permit for the fishery shall be assigned to a priority classification based solely upon the applicant’s qualifications as of the effective date of the statute or regulation establishing the moratorium.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 3 ch 126 SLA 1974; am § 6 ch 47 SLA 1981; am § 11 ch 145 SLA 1984; am §§ 10 — 13 ch 34 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 125 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For limited fisheries, see 20 AAC 5, art. 3.

For interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 4.

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.

For priority classification point system, see 20 AAC 5, art. 6.

Sec. 16.43.270.
Initial issuance of entry permits.

The commission shall issue entry permits, for each fishery, first to all qualified applicants in the priority classifications designated under AS

16.43.250(b)

and then to qualified applicants in order of descending priority classification, until the number of entry permits issued equals the maximum number of entry permits established under AS

16.43.230

and

16.43.240

for each fishery, except that a person within a priority classification specified under AS

16.43.250(b)

may not be denied an entry permit.

If, within the lowest priority classification of qualified applicants to which some entry permits may be issued, there are more applicants than there are entry permits to be issued, then the allocation of entry permits within that priority classification shall be by lottery. However, the commission shall issue entry permits to all qualified applicants in that priority classification if the total number of permits issued for the fishery does not exceed the maximum number of entry permits established under AS

16.43.240

for that fishery by more than five percent or 10 permits, whichever is greater.

If, at the time entry permits are issued, some applicants are still appealing the findings of an administrative adjudication under AS

16.43.260

, a sufficient number of permits shall be reserved out of the permits to be issued to protect the rights of those applicants, assuming all the appeals will be resolved in favor of the applicants. In the event that all appeals are not resolved in favor of the applicants, the remaining entry permits shall be allocated to the next most qualified applicants as provided in (a) and (b) of this section.

The commission may restrict the fishing capacity employed under an entry permit if, before the initial issuance of entry permits for a fishery, the commission determines that the fishing capacity in the fishery must be limited to achieve the purposes of this chapter, establishes criteria for determining the fishing capacity that is allowed under an entry permit, and establishes how fishing capacity will be measured. The maximum fishing capacity allowed under an entry permit must be based upon past participation in the fishery by the initial recipient of the entry permit during a period, specified by the commission, preceding the qualification date established under AS

16.43.260

. The commission may define fishing capacity in terms of quantity of fishing gear, a proportion of the maximum amount of gear that can be utilized in the fishery under regulations of the Board of Fisheries, fishing vessel size or other characteristics, or other factors determined by the commission to affect the amount of fishing effort in the fishery. The recipient or transferee of an entry permit issued subject to this subsection may not exceed the fishing capacity allowed under the entry permit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1973; am § 7 ch 47 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings in connection with the enactment of subsection (d) by § 3, ch. 82, SLA 1995, see § 1, ch. 82, SLA 1995 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For interim-use permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 4.

For issuance of entry permits, see 20 AAC 5, art. 5.

For priority classification point system, see 20 AAC 5, art. 6.

Secs. 16.43.275 — 16.43.285.
[Renumbered as AS 16.43.340 — 16.43.390.]